data/hunspell-cat/catalan-valencia.aff
FLAG long
# Model de conjugació: pregar
SFX 11 Y 84
SFX 11 r r/_v_Y_C ar
SFX 11 r nt/_v_Y_C ar
SFX 11 r t/_v_Y ar
SFX 11 r da/_Y ar
SFX 11 r ts/_Y ar
SFX 11 r des/_Y ar
SFX 11 ar o/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar ue/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar 0/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar ues/_Z ar
SFX 11 r 0/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar uem/_Z ar
SFX 11 r m/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar ueu/_Z ar
SFX 11 r u/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar uen/_Z ar
SFX 11 r va/_Z ar
SFX 11 r ves/_Z ar
SFX 11 r va/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar àvem/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar àveu/_Z ar
SFX 11 r ven/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar uí/_Z ar
SFX 11 r res/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar à/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 11 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 11 r ré/_Z ar
SFX 11 r ràs/_Z ar
SFX 11 r rà/_Z ar
SFX 11 r rem/_Z ar
SFX 11 r reu/_Z ar
SFX 11 r ran/_Z ar
SFX 11 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 11 r ries/_Z ar
SFX 11 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 11 r ríem/_Z ar
SFX 11 r ríeu/_Z ar
SFX 11 r rien/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar ue/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar ui/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar ues/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar uis/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar ue/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar ui/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar uem/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar ueu/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar uen/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar uin/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar ués/_Z ar
SFX 11 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar uessis/_Z ar
SFX 11 r res/_Z ar
SFX 11 r ssis/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar uesses/_Z ar
SFX 11 r sses/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar ués/_Z ar
SFX 11 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar uéssim/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar àssim/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar uéssem/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar àssem/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar uéssiu/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar àssiu/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar uésseu/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar àsseu/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar uessin/_Z ar
SFX 11 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 11 r ssin/_Z ar
SFX 11 ar uessen/_Z ar
SFX 11 r ssen/_Z ar
SFX 11 r 0/_D ar
SFX 11 ar ue/_D ar
SFX 11 ar ui/_D ar
SFX 11 ar uem/_C ar
SFX 11 r u/_C ar
SFX 11 ar ueu/_C ar
SFX 11 ar uen/_C ar
SFX 11 ar uin/_C ar

# Model de conjugació: servir
SFX 12 Y 90
SFX 12 r r/_v_Y_C ir
SFX 12 r nt/_v_Y_C ir
SFX 12 r t/_v_Y ir
SFX 12 r da/_Y ir
SFX 12 r ts/_Y ir
SFX 12 r des/_Y ir
SFX 12 ir eixo/_Z ir
SFX 12 r sc/_Z ir
SFX 12 ir esc/_Z ir
SFX 12 ir eixes/_Z ir
SFX 12 r xes/_Z ir
SFX 12 ir eix/_Z ir
SFX 12 r x/_Z ir
SFX 12 r m/_Z ir
SFX 12 r u/_Z ir
SFX 12 ir eixen/_Z ir
SFX 12 r xen/_Z ir
SFX 12 r a/_Z ir
SFX 12 r es/_Z ir
SFX 12 r a/_Z ir
SFX 12 ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 12 ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 12 r en/_Z ir
SFX 12 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 12 r res/_Z ir
SFX 12 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 12 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 12 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 12 r ren/_Z ir
SFX 12 r ré/_Z ir
SFX 12 r ràs/_Z ir
SFX 12 r rà/_Z ir
SFX 12 r rem/_Z ir
SFX 12 r reu/_Z ir
SFX 12 r ran/_Z ir
SFX 12 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 12 r ries/_Z ir
SFX 12 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 12 r ríem/_Z ir
SFX 12 r ríeu/_Z ir
SFX 12 r rien/_Z ir
SFX 12 ir esca/_Z ir
SFX 12 r sca/_Z ir
SFX 12 ir esqui/_Z ir
SFX 12 ir eixi/_Z ir
SFX 12 ir esques/_Z ir
SFX 12 r sques/_Z ir
SFX 12 ir esquis/_Z ir
SFX 12 ir eixis/_Z ir
SFX 12 ir esca/_Z ir
SFX 12 r sca/_Z ir
SFX 12 ir esqui/_Z ir
SFX 12 ir eixi/_Z ir
SFX 12 r m/_Z ir
SFX 12 r guem/_Z ir
SFX 12 r u/_Z ir
SFX 12 r gueu/_Z ir
SFX 12 ir esquen/_Z ir
SFX 12 r squen/_Z ir
SFX 12 ir esquin/_Z ir
SFX 12 ir eixin/_Z ir
SFX 12 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 12 r ra/_Z ir
SFX 12 r ssis/_Z ir
SFX 12 r res/_Z ir
SFX 12 r sses/_Z ir
SFX 12 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 12 r ra/_Z ir
SFX 12 ir íssim/_Z ir
SFX 12 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 12 ir íssem/_Z ir
SFX 12 ir íssiu/_Z ir
SFX 12 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 12 ir ísseu/_Z ir
SFX 12 r ssin/_Z ir
SFX 12 r ren/_Z ir
SFX 12 r ssen/_Z ir
SFX 12 ir eix/_C ir
SFX 12 r x/_C ir
SFX 12 ir esca/_D ir
SFX 12 r sca/_D ir
SFX 12 ir esqui/_D ir
SFX 12 ir eixi/_D ir
SFX 12 r m/_C ir
SFX 12 r guem/_C ir
SFX 12 r u/_C ir
SFX 12 ir esquen/_C ir
SFX 12 r squen/_C ir
SFX 12 ir esquin/_C ir
SFX 12 ir eixin/_C ir

# Model de conjugació: traduir
SFX 13 Y 90
SFX 13 r r/_v_Y_C ir
SFX 13 r nt/_v_Y_C ir
SFX 13 ir ït/_v_Y ir
SFX 13 ir ïda/_Y ir
SFX 13 ir ïts/_Y ir
SFX 13 ir ïdes/_Y ir
SFX 13 ir eixo/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir ïsc/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir esc/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir eixes/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir ïxes/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir eix/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir ïx/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir ïm/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir ïu/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir eixen/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir ïxen/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir ïa/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir ïes/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir ïa/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir ïen/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir ïres/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir ïren/_Z ir
SFX 13 r ré/_Z ir
SFX 13 r ràs/_Z ir
SFX 13 r rà/_Z ir
SFX 13 r rem/_Z ir
SFX 13 r reu/_Z ir
SFX 13 r ran/_Z ir
SFX 13 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 13 r ries/_Z ir
SFX 13 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 13 r ríem/_Z ir
SFX 13 r ríeu/_Z ir
SFX 13 r rien/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir esca/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir ïsca/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir esqui/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir eixi/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir esques/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir ïsques/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir esquis/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir eixis/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir esca/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir ïsca/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir esqui/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir eixi/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir ïm/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir ïguem/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir ïu/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir ïgueu/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir esquen/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir ïsquen/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir esquin/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir eixin/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir ïra/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir ïssis/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir ïres/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir ïsses/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir ïra/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir íssim/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir íssem/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir íssiu/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir ísseu/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir ïssin/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir ïren/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir ïssen/_Z ir
SFX 13 ir eix/_C ir
SFX 13 ir ïx/_C ir
SFX 13 ir esca/_D ir
SFX 13 ir ïsca/_D ir
SFX 13 ir esqui/_D ir
SFX 13 ir eixi/_D ir
SFX 13 ir ïm/_C ir
SFX 13 ir ïguem/_C ir
SFX 13 ir ïu/_C ir
SFX 13 ir esquen/_C ir
SFX 13 ir ïsquen/_C ir
SFX 13 ir esquin/_C ir
SFX 13 ir eixin/_C ir

# Model de conjugació: trencar
SFX 14 Y 84
SFX 14 r r/_v_Y_C ar
SFX 14 r nt/_v_Y_C ar
SFX 14 r t/_v_Y ar
SFX 14 r da/_Y ar
SFX 14 r ts/_Y ar
SFX 14 r des/_Y ar
SFX 14 ar o/_Z ar
SFX 14 car que/_Z ar
SFX 14 ar 0/_Z ar
SFX 14 car ques/_Z ar
SFX 14 r 0/_Z ar
SFX 14 car quem/_Z ar
SFX 14 r m/_Z ar
SFX 14 car queu/_Z ar
SFX 14 r u/_Z ar
SFX 14 car quen/_Z ar
SFX 14 r va/_Z ar
SFX 14 r ves/_Z ar
SFX 14 r va/_Z ar
SFX 14 ar àvem/_Z ar
SFX 14 ar àveu/_Z ar
SFX 14 r ven/_Z ar
SFX 14 car quí/_Z ar
SFX 14 r res/_Z ar
SFX 14 ar à/_Z ar
SFX 14 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 14 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 14 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 14 r ré/_Z ar
SFX 14 r ràs/_Z ar
SFX 14 r rà/_Z ar
SFX 14 r rem/_Z ar
SFX 14 r reu/_Z ar
SFX 14 r ran/_Z ar
SFX 14 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 14 r ries/_Z ar
SFX 14 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 14 r ríem/_Z ar
SFX 14 r ríeu/_Z ar
SFX 14 r rien/_Z ar
SFX 14 car que/_Z ar
SFX 14 car qui/_Z ar
SFX 14 car ques/_Z ar
SFX 14 car quis/_Z ar
SFX 14 car que/_Z ar
SFX 14 car qui/_Z ar
SFX 14 car quem/_Z ar
SFX 14 car queu/_Z ar
SFX 14 car quen/_Z ar
SFX 14 car quin/_Z ar
SFX 14 car qués/_Z ar
SFX 14 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 14 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 14 car quessis/_Z ar
SFX 14 r res/_Z ar
SFX 14 r ssis/_Z ar
SFX 14 car quesses/_Z ar
SFX 14 r sses/_Z ar
SFX 14 car qués/_Z ar
SFX 14 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 14 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 14 car quéssim/_Z ar
SFX 14 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 14 ar àssim/_Z ar
SFX 14 car quéssem/_Z ar
SFX 14 ar àssem/_Z ar
SFX 14 car quéssiu/_Z ar
SFX 14 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 14 ar àssiu/_Z ar
SFX 14 car quésseu/_Z ar
SFX 14 ar àsseu/_Z ar
SFX 14 car quessin/_Z ar
SFX 14 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 14 r ssin/_Z ar
SFX 14 car quessen/_Z ar
SFX 14 r ssen/_Z ar
SFX 14 r 0/_D ar
SFX 14 car que/_D ar
SFX 14 car qui/_D ar
SFX 14 car quem/_C ar
SFX 14 r u/_C ar
SFX 14 car queu/_C ar
SFX 14 car quen/_C ar
SFX 14 car quin/_C ar
